Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-215
Research and extension
centers;
income; use.

The proceeds arising from the sale
of products of the research
and extension centers provided for in sections 85-201 and 85-206 shall be applied
to the liquidation of the running expenses of the research and extension centers from
which they are sold, and all money so accruing shall be credited as coming
from the state and be applied as a part or whole payment of any amount which
may be appropriated from the funds of the state for the maintenance of such
research and extension centers.

Laws 1903, c. 114, § 5, p. 591;

Laws 1909, c. 143, § 5, p. 502;

Laws 1909, c. 144, § 5, p. 503;

R.S.1913, § 7146;

C.S.1922, § 6796;

Laws 1929, c. 15, § 4, p. 96;

C.S.1929, § 85-212;

R.S.1943, § 85-215;

Laws 1959, c. 461, § 2, p. 1529;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 83;

Laws 2011, LB334, § 8.